de: Texturebene: Stufe 1 (püriert); Stufe 2 (gehackt); Stufe 3 (weiche oder mundgerechte Lebensmittel); Sonstiges
pt-BR: Nível de textura: Nível 1 (purê); Nível 2 (picado); Nível 3 (alimentos macios ou pequenos); Outro
hu: Struktúraszint: 1. szint (pürésítve); 2. szint (darált); 3. szint (puha vagy falatnyi ételek); Egyéb
fr: Niveau de texture: Niveau 1 (en purée); Niveau 2 (haché); Niveau 3 (aliments mous ou bouchées); Autre
zh-TW: 質地等級: 1 級 (泥狀); 2 級 (切碎); 3 級 (軟的或一口大小的食物); 其他
sl-SI: Raven teksture: 1. stopnja (pire); 2. stopnja (mleto); Raven 3 (mehka hrana ali živila v velikosti grižljajev); Drugo
ko: 질감 수준: 1단계(퓨레); 2단계(다짐); 3단계(부드럽거나 한 입 크기 음식); 기타
pt-PT: Nível de textura: Nível 1 (em puré); Nível 2 (moído); Nível 3 (alimentos macios ou em pequenas porções); Outro
bg-BG: Ниво на текстура: Ниво 1 (пюре); Ниво 2 (кайма); Ниво 3 (меки храни или храни на хапки); Други
ru: Уровень текстуры: Уровень 1 (пюре); Уровень 2 (измельчение); Уровень 3 (мягкая или мелкая пища); Другой
sv: Strukturnivå: Nivå 1 (puréad); Nivå 2 (mald); Nivå 3 (mjuk eller lagom tuggor); Övrigt
nl: Textuurniveau: Niveau 1 (gepureerd); Niveau 2 (gehakt); Niveau 3 (zachte of hapklare voeding); Andere
th: ระดับพื้นผิว: ระดับที่ 1 (บด); ระดับที่ 2 (สับ); ระดับที่ 3 (อาหารอ่อนหรือขนาดพอดีคำ); อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Úroveň konzistencie: Úroveň 1 (pyré); Úroveň 2 (mleté); Úroveň 3 (mäkká konzistencia alebo sústo); Iné
pl: Stopień konsystencji: Poziom 1 (przecier); Poziom 2 (rozdrobniony); Poziom 3 (żywność miękka lub wielkości kęsa); Inne
da: Teksturniveau: Niveau 1 (pureret); Niveau 2 (hakket); Niveau 3 (bløde eller små stykker mad); Andet
fi: Tekstuuritaso: Taso 1 (soseutettu); Taso 2 (jauhettu); Taso 3 (pehmeät tai pienikokoiset ruoat); Muu
en: Texture level: Level 1 (puréed); Level 2 (minced); Level 3 (soft or bite-sized foods); Other
ja: 食感レベル: レベル1 (裏ごし); レベル2 (みじん切り); レベル3 (柔らかい食べ物または一口サイズの食べ物); その他
nb: Teksturnivå: Nivå 1 (purert); Nivå 2 (hakket); Nivå 3 (myk mat eller små munnfuller); Annet
it: Livello di consistenza: Livello 1 (purea); Livello 2 (tritato); Livello 3 (alimenti morbidi o bocconcini); Altro
es: Nivel de textura: Nivel 1 (puré); Nivel 2 (picado); Nivel 3 (alimentos blandos o del tamaño de un bocado); Otros
zh-CN: 质地等级: 1 段（泥）; 2 段（碎末）; 3 段（柔软或一口大小的食物）; 其他
lt-LT: Tekstūros lygis: 1 lygis (tyrė); 2 lygis (trinta); 3 lygis (minkštas arba kąsnio dydžio maistas); Kita
ro-RO: Nivelul texturii: Nivelul 1 (pure); Nivelul 2 (tocat); Nivelul 3 (alimente moi sau de dimensiuni mici); Altele
vi: Mức độ kết cấu: Cấp độ 1 (nghiền nhuyễn); Cấp độ 2 (băm nhỏ); Cấp độ 3 (thức ăn mềm hoặc vừa ăn); Khác
hr-HR: Razina teksture: Razina 1 (pire); Razina 2 (mljeveno); Razina 3 (mekana hrana ili hrana veličine zalogaja); Ostalo
tr: Doku düzeyi: Seviye (püre haline getirilmiş); Seviye (kıyılmış); Seviye (yumuşak veya lokmalık yiyecekler); Diğer
cs: Stupeň rozmělnění: Úroveň 1 (pyré); Úroveň 2 (mleté); Úroveň 3 (měkké nebo sousta); Jiné
el: Επίπεδο υφής: Επίπεδο 1 (πουρέ); Επίπεδο 2 (κιμάς); Επίπεδο 3 (μαλακά ή φαγητά σε μέγεθος μπουκιάς); Άλλο